Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1651.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 38, chapter 2.1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 38-387, to read: START_STATUTE38-387. Absence of state elected official during official state events A. The lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, the attorney general or the state treasurer, on a rotating basis, shall be excused and absent from the vicinity of the seat of government during the inauguration of state elected officials, the annual governor's state of the state address or any other state address by the governor or gubernatorial event where members of the executive department participate or are in attendance. B. For an event described in subsection A of this section, the department of public safety shall coordinate an off-site location for the excused and absent elected official.  The elected official shall remain off-site until the conclusion of the event. END_STATUTE